District of Columbia statutes.
22-3133

Stalking.

(a)

It is unlawful for a person to purposefully engage in a course of conduct directed at a specific individual:

(1)

With the intent to cause that individual to:

(A)

Fear for his or her safety or the safety of another person;

(B)

Feel seriously alarmed, disturbed, or frightened; or

(C)

Suffer emotional distress;

(2)

That the person knows would cause that individual reasonably to:

(A)

Fear for his or her safety or the safety of another person;

(B)

Feel seriously alarmed, disturbed, or frightened; or

(C)

Suffer emotional distress; or

(3)

That the person should have known would cause a reasonable person in the individual’s circumstances to:

(A)

Fear for his or her safety or the safety of another person;

(B)

Feel seriously alarmed, disturbed, or frightened; or

(C)

Suffer emotional distress.

(b)

This section does not apply to constitutionally protected activity.

(c)

Where a single act is of a continuing nature, each 24-hour period constitutes a separate occasion.

(d)

The conduct on each of the occasions need not be the same as it is on the others.

Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 503, 56 DCR 7413
This section is referenced in § 22-3134 and § 23-581.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 503 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 503 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).